Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB2208.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 4706 of Title 75 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended by adding a subsection to read:§ 4706. Prohibition on expenditures for emission inspection program.* * *(h.1) Revised State implementation plan.--(1) Within 60 days of the effective date of this paragraph, the Department of Environmental Protection shall initiate the process of removing a county of the fourth class with a population between 168,000 and 169,000 based on the most recent Federal decennial census from the enhanced vehicle emission inspection and maintenance program.(2) The revised State implementation plan shall be 123456789101112131415161718 completed and submitted to the United States Environmental Protection Agency no later than January 1, 2026, and shall convincingly demonstrate that the county described under paragraph (1) can maintain the relevant standards without benefit of the emissions reductions attributable to the vehicle emission inspection and maintenance program.(3) The Department of Environmental Protection shall comply with Federal law during the process of the revision, including by ensuring that the revision does not interfere with attainment requirements or reasonable further progress toward attainment, and that Federal funding is not negatively impacted as a result of the revision.(4) The Department of Environmental Protection shall notify the following of the submission of the revised State implementation plan to the United States Environmental Protection Agency:(i) The chairperson and minority chairperson of the Environmental Resources and Energy Committee of the Senate.(ii) The chairperson and minority chairperson of the Environmental and Natural Resource Protection Committee of the House of Representatives.(iii) The chairperson and minority chairperson of the Transportation Committee of the Senate.(iv) The chairperson and minority chairperson of the Transportation Committee of the House of Representatives.(5) After approval by the United States Environmental Protection Agency of the revised State implementation plan, the Secretary of Environmental Protection shall transmit notice of the approval to the Legislative Reference Bureau 20260HB2208PN2902 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 for publication in the next available issue of the Pennsylvania Bulletin.* * *Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20260HB2208PN2902 - 3 - 1234